Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Civil penalty" means a monetary penalty administratively issued by a regulatory agency for noncompliance with state or federal law or rules. The term does not include any criminal penalty, damage assessments, wages, premiums, or taxes owed, or interest or late fees on any existing obligation.

(2) "Regulatory agency" means an agency as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that has the authority to issue civil penalties. The term does not include the state patrol or any institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(3) "Technical assistance" includes:

(a) Information on the laws, rules, and compliance methods and technologies applicable to the regulatory agency's programs;

(b) Information on methods to avoid compliance problems;

(c) Assistance in applying for permits; and

(d) Information on the mission, goals, and objectives of the program.

(4) "Technical assistance documents" means documents prepared to provide information specified in subsection (3) of this section entitled a technical assistance document by the agency head or its designee. Technical assistance documents do not include notices of correction, violation, or enforcement action. Technical assistance documents do not impose mandatory obligations or serve as the basis for a citation.

[ 1999 c 236 s 1; 1995 c 403 s 602.]